incubator/apertium-wal/tests/verbs-iss.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
      App: hfst-lookup
      Gen: ../wal.autogen.hfst
      Morph: ../wal.automorf.hfst

Tests:

 "[twol] geminates reduce before -iss":
    shamm<v><tv><cau><p1><sing><neg><imfr> : shamissikke

 "[twol] exceptional stems where geminate does not reduce before -iss":
    azall<v><iv><cau><p1><sing><neg><imfr> : azallissikke
    harumm<v><tv><cau><p1><sing><neg><imfr> : harummissikke

 "[twol] cc > sh before -iss":
    kacc<v><tv><cau><p1><sing><neg><imfr> : kashissikke

 "[twol] loss of final consonant before -iss":
    ak<v><iv><cau><p1><sing><neg><imfr> : aissikke

 "[twol] mono-cononantal verbs double i in -iss":
    g<v><iv><cau><p1><sing><neg><imfr> : giissikke
